Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 5. Student Driver Education and Training Program

§§ 1041-1044.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§ 1045.
Driver training course.

A driver education and training course, approved by the Agency of Education and the Department of Motor Vehicles, shall be made available to students whose parent or guardian is a resident of Vermont and who have reached their 15th birthday and who are regularly enrolled in a public or independent high school approved by the State Board.

After June 30, 1984, all driver education courses shall include a course of instruction approved by the State Board and the council on the effects of alcohol and drugs on driving.

All driver education courses shall include instruction on motor vehicle liability insurance and the motor vehicle financial responsibility laws of the State.

All driver education courses shall include instruction on the adverse environmental, health, economic, and other effects of unnecessary idling of motor vehicles and on the law governing prohibited idling of motor vehicles.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 69; amended

1975, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 10, eff. Oct. 22, 1975;

1983, No. 51

, § 5, eff. April 22, 1983;

1985, No. 77

, § 6;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

2013, No. 57

, § 29.

§ 1046.
Arrangement.

Subject to the approval of the Secretary, each superintendent shall arrange for the establishment of a driver education and training course for all public and approved independent schools located within his or her jurisdiction that so request.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 70; amended

1991, No. 24

, § 5;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 106, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1047.
State to pay costs.

The State shall pay to each school providing an approved driver education and training course an amount per pupil instructed in driver education to be determined annually by the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 71; amended

1975, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 11, eff. Oct. 22, 1975;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 70.

§ 1047a.
Driver’s education grants.

The purpose of the driver’s education grant program is to provide increased availability and quality of driver’s education programs for Vermont students to prepare them for the responsibilities and requirements of safely operating a motor vehicle.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of Education shall cooperatively establish and implement a driver’s education grant program that improves the availability and quality of driver’s education programs. Eligible applicants shall include Vermont public secondary and career and technical centers and supervisory unions on behalf of a school or schools. Grant awards shall be up to $12,500.00. Eligible activities shall include one or more of the following:

proposals and activities that result in increased parental involvement;

increased availability of driver’s education, including reducing waiting lists;

increased exposure to nighttime driving;

increased exposure to diverse weather conditions;

costs associated with the purchase and use of simulators;

increased practice with the operation of standard transmissions;

creative proposals designed to reduce alcohol abuse among enrolled students, including peer counseling;

training opportunities for educators; and

purchase of materials and equipment designed to enhance curricula.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 107, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1048.
Administration.

The administration of this subchapter, including the training and qualification of instructors and selection of instructional material and visual aids, shall be in the Agency.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 72; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 108, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.